Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Part 5

Military Property — Armories

58-1-501. Authority to acquire lands.

The governor is authorized and empowered on behalf of the state to acquire by lease, purchase and condemnation under the laws of eminent domain, such land as the governor in times of emergency may deem necessary to provide adequate facilities for the protection and defense of the state and the nation.

Acts 1941, ch. 2, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 186.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-507.

Cross-References. Condemnation of land, § 58-1-504.

Real property for military department, acquisition, disposal and administration by adjutant general, § 58-1-506.

58-1-502. Proclamation of emergency.

It shall be the duty of the governor to announce publicly by proclamation filed with the secretary of state the emergency necessitating the acquisition of such land before exercising the authority vested in the governor by § 58-1-501.

Acts 1941, ch. 2, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 186.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-508.

58-1-503. Payment for lands.

The lands so acquired in accordance with §§ 58-1-501 — 58-1-505 will be paid for out of the funds of the state not otherwise appropriated.

Acts 1941, ch. 2, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 186.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-509.

58-1-504. Condemnation of land.

If it is necessary to institute condemnation proceedings to acquire lands authorized to be acquired by § 58-1-501, such proceedings shall be instituted in the name of the state of Tennessee against the property owner or owners, and the property shall be condemned under the general statutes providing for condemnation of lands for public purposes and containing the law of eminent domain.

Acts 1941, ch. 2, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 186.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-510.

Cross-References. General eminent domain law, title 29, ch. 16.

Private property not to be taken for public use without just compensation, Tenn. Const., art. I, § 21.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 9.

58-1-505. Lease to United States.

The governor is authorized and empowered to lease lands acquired in accordance with §§ 58-1-501 — 58-1-504, to the United States government when such action is deemed by the governor to be advantageous to the defense of the state and the nation. A lease of such land executed by the governor in the name of the state of Tennessee will be adequate to vest in the United States government such leasehold rights as shall therein be set out.

Acts 1941, ch. 2, § 5; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 186.7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-511.

58-1-506. Acquisition, disposal and administration of real property by adjutant general — Authority to enter into cooperative agreements.

The adjutant general, under the direction and supervision of the governor, shall administer all real property under the jurisdiction of the military department:

When it is deemed desirable to acquire additional real property or any interest therein for the activities of the military department and such property shall be acquired by the adjutant general when so authorized by the general law for other state departments and agencies;

When it is deemed desirable to dispose of any real property or any interest therein under the jurisdiction of the military department, the adjutant general shall execute the conveyance on behalf of the state, but the conveyance shall be approved by such other officials as may be required by law to approve conveyances of the state's real property; provided, that in no event shall real property under the jurisdiction of the military department be disposed of without the approval of the governor, and such real property shall be disposed of in the way and manner and in accordance with such procedures as provided by the general law as to the disposition of other real property belonging to the state;

The adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, may enter into cooperative agreements with the federal government and its local governmental subdivisions or agencies in connection with all phases of the activities of the military department including the joint use and occupancy of buildings and grounds including, but not limited to, aviation or airport facilities. Such agreements and contracts including, but not limited to, licenses and leases which have heretofore been entered into by the adjutant general and/or the governor are hereby authorized and validated.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 85; T.C.A., § 7-513.

Cross-References. Disposition of state real property, § 12-2-112.

Land for defense of state and nation, governor authorized to acquire, §§ 58-1-501 — 58-1-505.

National guard armory accommodations, § 58-1-206.

State acquisition and maintenance of facilities not adequately furnished by United States, counties or municipal corporations, see § 58-1-206.

State guard armories, facilities, property and equipment, § 58-1-405.

58-1-507. “Armory” defined.

“Armory,” whenever used in §§ 58-1-507 — 58-1-512, includes any building, buildings, aircraft hangars, offices, quarters, or other facilities, and real property provided for and devoted to the training and housing of the national guard.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 78; T.C.A., § 7-514.

58-1-508. Plans for armories — Acceptance and use of funds.

When funds are made available, the adjutant general, with the approval of the state building commission and in accordance with the policies and procedures of the commission, is vested with the power, jurisdiction and authority to employ architects, contractors and other employees and to cause proper plans and specifications to be prepared or drafted for armories and facilities and their equipment and furnishings. The adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, is further empowered to accept any aid, financial or otherwise, from any municipality and/or county of this state, as well as federal, in carrying out the purpose of §§ 58-1-507 — 58-1-512 and constructing such armories and facilities.

Funds made available to the adjutant general for the adjutant general's use in carrying out the purposes and objects mentioned in §§ 58-1-507 — 58-1-512 shall be expended therefor, as when and where directed by the adjutant general, with the approval of the governor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 80; 1971, ch. 99, § 2; T.C.A., § 7-516; Acts 1990, ch. 734, § 1.

Cross-References. Agreements for private development, construction, and operation of facilities, § 12-2-116.

58-1-509. Location of armories throughout state — Acceptance of money or sites from municipalities or counties authorized.

The adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, shall have the right to provide armories throughout the state to be located at most advantageous points in the discretion of the adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, and the adjutant general, with approval of the governor, may accept from any municipality or county donations, either of money or of sites or both for such armory, to be used in the construction thereof. The location of the armory, plans, specifications and costs thereof shall in all instances be approved in advance by the adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, and in writing; and any available funds appropriated or allocated under the law for the purpose of such construction shall be used by the adjutant general, with approval of the governor, for that purpose.

The adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, shall also have the right to provide armories, both within and without the corporate limits of the cities and towns, and municipalities are authorized to procure real property outside their corporate limits as sites for such armories, and to expend their tax revenues and other funds for such purposes. The municipalities and counties are further authorized to contribute to and participate in the construction costs of such armories and are authorized to expend their tax revenues and other funds for such purposes.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 81; 1971, ch. 99, § 3; T.C.A., § 7-517.

58-1-510. Appropriations of money or property by counties or municipal corporations for defense.

The governing authorities of the counties and municipal corporations of the state are authorized to make appropriations from the funds of such counties and municipal corporations, and are authorized to lease, lend, sell or donate property, both real and personal, of such counties and municipal corporations, to the state of Tennessee and the federal government for purposes of local, state and national defense and for the use of the national guard.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 82; T.C.A., § 7-518.

58-1-511. Title to armories.

The title to all armories procured under §§ 58-1-507 — 58-1-512 shall be taken in the name of the state.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 83; T.C.A., § 7-519.

58-1-512. Adjutant general in charge of armories — Rental income.

All armories, arsenals, camps, ranges, bases and other facilities owned, leased or maintained by the state or by the United States for the use of the national guard and all activities conducted therein shall be under the general charge and control and shall be regulated by the adjutant general.

When only one (1) unit occupies any of the facilities hereinabove set forth, the commander of that unit shall have direct charge and control thereof and shall be known and designated as station commander.

Where two (2) or more units are stationed in any such facility, the adjutant general shall designate the officer to have direct charge and control thereof, and such officer shall likewise be known as the station commander.

The station commander shall apportion the quarters and facilities therein to be occupied by each unit and shall regulate the use and be responsible for the care thereof.

All income derived from the use of armories shall be retained by the station commander and shall be deposited in a “station commander's upkeep and maintenance fund” and shall be used, under regulations promulgated by the adjutant general, for maintenance, repair, upkeep, alteration, equipment, modification or improvement of the armory, facilities or area adjacent thereto.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 84; T.C.A., § 7-520.

58-1-513. Purchase and issue of property — Disposal of surplus and obsolete property.

Under the direction of the governor, the adjutant general shall authorize the purchase of such property as may be required for the use of the military department, all such purchases to be made through the state purchasing director.

No property shall be issued to persons or organizations other than those belonging to the national guard and such forces as may be organized pursuant to parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter. Obsolete and/or surplus military property of the state, however, may be issued or sold by the adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, to municipalities and to educational, patriotic and charitable organizations under such conditions as may be prescribed by regulations issued pursuant to parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 23; T.C.A., § 7-521.

Cross-References. Fraudulent disposition of military property, penalty, § 58-1-630.

Unauthorized sale or disposition of military property and equipment, § 58-1-634.

Unlawful dealing in military property, penalty, § 58-1-603.

Wrongful disposition of military property, penalty, § 58-1-623.

58-1-514. Federal property — Care and custody.

Federal property, issued to the Tennessee national guard, shall not be used for any purpose other than that for which such was issued, and shall not be loaned for any other activity, either state, civilian, or federal, except to the extent authorized by appropriate regulations. All such property shall be deposited in the armories, headquarters, warehouses, arsenals, or other facilities provided for the purpose and shall not be removed therefrom except for service under proper authority and orders.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 24; T.C.A., § 7-522.

Cross-References. Responsibility for military property and funds, § 58-1-515.

58-1-515. Responsibility for military property and funds — Collection from member or employee — Action by attorney general.

Military property of the state and of the United States shall be issued, safeguarded, maintained, accounted for, inventoried, inspected, surveyed and disposed of as provided in applicable laws and regulations issued thereunder and regulations issued pursuant to parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter.

When state-owned military property is lost, damaged or destroyed through the negligence or fault of a member or employee of the national guard, the amount determined as the value of such property or the cost of repairing the same may be collected from any pay or allowance due or to become due to the member or employee of the national guard from the state, in addition to the remedies herein prescribed.

An action may be maintained in the name of the state in any court having jurisdiction thereof by the attorney general and reporter, upon the request of the adjutant general, to recover, from a member or former member of the national guard found responsible for any state or federal military property lost, damaged or destroyed through negligence or fault, the amount determined as the value of such property or the cost of repairing the same.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 27; T.C.A., § 7-523.

Cross-References. Fraudulent disposition of property furnished or intended for national guard, § 58-1-630.

Loss, damage, destruction or wrongful disposition of military property by state military forces personnel is a felony punishable as theft, § 58-1-623.

Unauthorized sale or disposition of military property or equipment, § 58-1-634.

Unlawful dealing in military property, penalty, § 58-1-603.